District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
30 act may be cited as the “Common Sense TOPA Reform Amendment Act of 2025”.
1

31 Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980, effective September 10,
32 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86, D.C. Official Code § 42-3401.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
33 (a) A new section 401a is added to read as follows:
34 “Sec. 401a. Definitions.
35 “For the purposes of this subchapter:
36 “(1) “Appraised value” means the value of a housing accommodation as of the
37 date of the appraisal, based on an objective, independent property valuation, performed
38 according to professional appraisal industry standards.
39 “(2) “Bona fide offer of sale” means an offer of sale for a housing accommodation
40 or the interest in the housing accommodation that is either:
41 “(A) For a price and other material terms that are at least as favorable as
42 those accepted by a purchaser in an arm’s length third-party contract; or
43 (B) In the absence of an arm’s length third-party contract, an offer of sale
44 with a price at the appraised value and other material terms comparable to that at which a willing
45 seller and a willing buyer would sell and purchase the housing accommodation, or the appraised
46 value.
47 “(3) “Buyout” means a payment or any other consideration provided to a Tenant
48 in exchange for relinquishing some or all pre-existing tenancy or occupancy rights.
49 “(4) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community
50 Development, or any successor agency.
51 “(5) “Owner” means:
52 “(A) Any person, or any one of a number of persons, in whom is vested all
53 or any part of the beneficial ownership, dominion, or title of a housing accommodation; or
2

54 “(B) The committee, conservator, or legal guardian of an owner who is
55 non compos mentis, a minor child, or otherwise under a disability.
56 “(5) "Tenant" means any renter, tenant, subtenant, lessee, or sublessee of a rental
57 unit, or successor to a renter’s interest, or any group of tenants, subtenants, lessees, or sublessees
58 of any rental unit, or any other person entitled to the use or occupancy of a rental unit.
59 “(6) “Tenant support provider” means:
60 “(A) Any person or organization certified by the Mayor pursuant to
61 section 402c; or
62 “(B) The Office of the Tenant Advocate, as established by Subtitle G of
63 title II of the Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C.
64 Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 42-3531.01 et seq.).
65 “(7) “Qualified purchaser” means any person certified by the Mayor pursuant to
66 section 402d, or an agency or instrumentality of the District.”.
67 (b) Section 402 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.02) is amended as follows:
68 (1) The section title is amended to read as follows:
69 “Sec. 402. Tenant opportunity to purchase.”.
70 (2) Subsection (a-2)(1) is repealed.
71 (3) Subsection (b) is repealed.
72 (4) Subsection (c) is repealed.
73 (5) Subsection (d) is repealed.
74 (6) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
75 “(e)(1) Within 5 days of a request by any person, the Mayor shall provide:
3

76 “(A) Written certifications, including the date of receipt or non-receipt, of
77 any notices received under subchapters IV and V of this chapter; and
78 “(B) Copies of the notices.
79 “(2) The certifications may be recorded among the records of the Recorder of
80 Deeds and shall be exempt from filing fees.”.
81 (c) A new section 402b is added to read as follows:
82 “Sec. 402b. “Sale” defined; excluded properties.
83 “(a) For the purposes of subchapters IV and V of this chapter, the terms “sell” or “sale”
84 shall include, but are not limited to:
85 “(1) The execution of any agreement pursuant to which the owner of the housing
86 accommodation agrees to some, but not all, of the following:
87 “(A) Relinquishes possession of the property;
88 “(B) Extends an option to purchase the property for a sum certain at the
89 end of the assignment, lease, or encumbrance and provides that a portion of the payments
90 received pursuant to the agreement is to be applied to the purchase price;
91 “(C) Assigns all rights and interests in all contracts that relate to the
92 property;
93 “(D) Requires that the costs of all taxes and other government charges
94 assessed and levied against the property during the term of the agreement are to be paid by the
95 lessee either directly or through a surcharge paid to the owner;
96 “(E) Extends an option to purchase an ownership interest in the property,
97 which may be exercised at any time after execution of the agreement but shall be exercised
98 before the expiration of the agreement; and
4

99 “(F) Requires the assignee or lessee to maintain personal injury and
100 property damage liability insurance on the property that names the owner as the additional
101 insured.
102 “(2) Multiple transfers of minority interests in the Rental Property which, in
103 effect, result in a transfer of the Rental Property.
104 “(3) A master lease which meets some, but not all, of the factors described in
105 paragraph (1) of this subsection or which is similar in effect;
106 “(4) The transfer of an ownership interest in a corporation, partnership, limited
107 liability company, association, trust, or other entity which owns an accommodation as its sole or
108 principal asset, which, in effect, results in the transfer of the accommodation pursuant to
109 paragraph (1) of this section. For the purposes of this sub-paragraph, the term “principal asset”
110 means the value of the accommodation relative to the entity’s other holdings.
111 “(b) For the purposes of subchapters IV and V of this chapter, and notwithstanding
112 anything to the contrary herein, the term “sell” or “sale” shall not include:
113 “(1)(A) A probate, trust, or inter vivos transfer to an heir and legatee, by a
114 decedent’s estate to members of the decedent’s family if the consideration arising from the
115 transfer will pass from the decedent’s estate to, or solely for the benefit of, charity.
116 “(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “members of the decedent’s
117 family” means:
118 “(i) A surviving spouse, or domestic partner as defined in section
119 2(3) of the Health Care Benefits Expansion Act of 1992, effective June 11, 1992 (D.C. Law 9-
120 114; D.C. Official Code § 32-701(3)), of the decedent, lineal descendants of the decedent, or
121 spouses of lineal descendants of the decedent;
5

122 “(ii) A trust for the primary benefit of the persons referred to in
123 sub-paragraph (i) and;
124 “(iii) A partnership, corporation, or other entity controlled by the
125 individuals referred to in sub-paragraphs (i) and (ii).
126 “(2) An inter-vivos transfer, even though for consideration, between spouses,
127 parent and child, siblings, grandparent and grandchild, or domestic partners as defined in section
128 2(3) of the Health Care Benefits Expansion Act of 1992, effective June 11, 1992 (D.C. Law 9-
129 114; D.C. Official Code § 32-701(3));
130 “(3) A transfer to a person entitled to property of an intestate decedent pursuant to
131 Chapter 3 of Title 19.
132 “(4) A transfer of legal title or an interest in an entity holding legal title to a
133 housing accommodation pursuant to a bona fide deed of trust or mortgage, and thereafter any
134 transfer by foreclosure sale or deed in lieu of foreclosure pursuant to a bona fide deed of trust or
135 mortgage;
136 “(5) A tax sale or transfer pursuant to tax foreclosure;
137 “(6) A bankruptcy sale;
138 “(7) Any transaction involving accommodations otherwise subject hereto
139 expressly contemplated by a registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange
140 Commission prior to February 22, 1994;
141 “(8) Any transfer of a property directly caused by a change in the form of the
142 entity owning the property; provided, that the transfer is without consideration, including a
143 transfer of interests in an entity to an entity under § 29-204.06;
6

144 “(9) The transfer of interests in a partnership or limited liability company that
145 owns an accommodation; provided, that the sole purpose of the transfer is to admit one or more
146 limited partners or investor members who will make capital contributions;
147 “(10) A transfer of title to the housing accommodation to an entity under § 29-
148 204.06;
149 “(11) A transfer of bare legal title into a revocable trust, without actual
150 consideration for the transfer, where the transferor is the current beneficiary of the trust pursuant
151 to Section 302(17) of the District of Columbia Deed Recordation Tax Act, approved March 2,
152 1962 (76 Stat. 11; D.C. Official Code 42-1102(17));
153 “(12) A transfer of the housing accommodation to a named beneficiary of a
154 revocable trust by reason of the death of the grantor of the revocable trust, pursuant to Section
155 302 of the District of Columbia Deed Recordation Tax Act, approved March 2, 1962 (76 Stat.
156 11; D.C. Official Code 42-1102);
157 “(12) A transfer of the housing accommodation by the trustee of a revocable trust
158 if the transfer would otherwise be excluded under this chapter if made by the grantor of the
159 revocable trust, pursuant to Section 302(19) of the District of Columbia Deed Recordation Tax
160 Act, approved March 2, 1962 (76 Stat. 11; D.C. Official Code 42-1102(19));
161 “(14) A transfer pursuant to court order or court-approved settlement;
162 “(15) A transfer by eminent domain or under threat of eminent domain;
163 “(16) A transfer of interest in an entity that owns a housing accommodation or a
164 transfer of title to a housing accommodation, if each of the following conditions is satisfied:
7

165 “(A) The credit period, as defined in section 42 of the United States
166 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved October 22, 1986 (100 Stat. 2189; 26 U.S.C. § 42)
167 ("IRC"), for the housing accommodation has ended;
168 “(B) Immediately prior to the transfer the housing accommodation is
169 subject to:
170 “(i) An extended low-income housing commitment, as that term is
171 defined in Section 42(h)(6)(B) of the IRC (100 Stat. 2189; 26 U.S.C. § 42(h)(6)(B)); or
172 “(ii) A comparable restrictive covenant as a result of a federal or
173 District program with occupancy, rent, and income requirements at least as restrictive as under
174 section 42 of the IRC;
175 "(C) Before and after the transfer, the owner of the housing
176 accommodation is controlled, directly or indirectly, by the same person or entity; and
177 "(D) Immediately following the transfer, the housing accommodation is
178 for a term of not less than 10 years subject to an existing or new extended low-income housing
179 commitment or a comparable restrictive covenant as a result of a federal or District program with
180 occupancy, rent and income requirements at least as restrictive as under section 42 of the IRC.
181 "(17) The transfer of interests in a partnership or limited liability company that
182 owns a housing accommodation; provided, that the sole purpose of the transfer is to allow for the
183 exit of one or more limited partners or investor members who have made capital contributions;
184 and
185 "(18) A transfer of interest in an entity that owns a housing accommodation or a
186 transfer of title to a housing accommodation, the sole purpose of which is to qualify for and enter
187 into a new credit period, as defined in section 42 of the IRC, for purposes of the rehabilitation of
8

188 the housing accommodation; provided that, before and after the transfer, the owner of the
189 housing accommodation is controlled, directly or indirectly, by the same person or entity.
190 “(c) The burden of proof to establish that a property or transfer is exempt from the
191 requirements of subchapters IV and V of this chapter shall be on the owner.
192 “(d) The following properties are exempt from the requirements of this subchapter:
193 “(1) Properties owned by the District of Columbia Housing Authority;
194 “(2) Properties owned by and operated as a hospital, convent, monastery,
195 extended care facility, convalescent home, or dormitories owned by educational institutions;
196 “(3) Newly constructed housing accommodations for which the initial certificate
197 of occupancy was issued no earlier than three years prior.”.
198 (d) A new section 402c is added to read as follows:
199 “Sec. 402c. Tenant support providers.
200 “(a) The Mayor shall establish a certification process for tenant support providers, which
201 shall be selected based on expertise and ability to counsel tenants who seek to exercise their
202 rights under this subchapter, and regarding:
203 “(1) The formation and governance of tenant organization and other legal and
204 collective ownership structures,
205 “(2) Technical support services for first-time homeowners;
206 “(3) Obtaining financing for the purchase of Real Properties; or
207 “(4) Assisting in the process of closing on property transactions.
208 “(b) The Department shall maintain a list of certified tenant support providers, with
209 contact information for each, on a publicly accessible website.
210 “(c) Certification as a tenant support provider shall be valid for four years.
9

211 “(d)A tenant support provider shall not:
212 “(1) Act in a manner that is adverse to the interests of a tenant occupying a
213 property subject to this subchapter;
214 “(2) Serve a tenant occupying a property in which the tenant support provider or
215 any employee thereof may have a present or future financial interest.
216 “(e) The Mayor shall promptly investigate any complaint alleging that a tenant support
217 provider has a conflict of interest or has failed to comply with the requirements of this
218 subchapter. If after the Mayor determines that a tenant support provider has a conflict of interest
219 or has failed to comply with the requirements of this subchapter, the Mayor may limit, suspend,
220 or revoke that organization’s certification.”.
221 (e) A new section 402d is added to read as follows:
222 “Sec. 402d. Qualified purchaser.
223 “(a) The Mayor shall establish criteria for the certification of qualified purchasers, which
224 shall be selected based on:
225 “(1) The capacity to acquire, own, manage, and improve or redevelop, either
226 independently or through an agent, housing accommodations and related facilities acquired under
227 this subchapter or subchapter IV-A for the remaining useful life of the housing accommodation;
228 “(2) Understanding of, and ability to comply with, the requirements of this
229 subchapter.
230 “(b) Certification as a qualified purchaser shall be valid for four years.
231 “(c)(1) The Mayor shall solicit new applications qualified purchasers on a rolling basis.
232 “(2) The Mayor shall recruit and solicit applications from reputable parties that
233 have not previously conducted real estate transactions in the District.
10

234 “(3) For the first four-year period after the effective date of this section, a Pre-
235 Approved Developer, as that term is defined in 14 DCMR § 2499, shall be granted certification
236 as a qualified purchaser.
237 “(d) The Department shall maintain a list of qualified purchasers on a publicly accessible
238 website.
239 “(e)(1) A qualified purchaser shall be in compliance with the entity filing requirements as
240 prescribed in § 29–102.01.
241 “(2) A qualified purchaser shall not act in a manner that is adverse to the interests
242 of tenants occupying a property subject to this subchapter. The Mayor shall promptly investigate
243 any complaint alleging that a qualified purchaser has a conflict of interest or has failed to comply
244 with the requirements of this subchapter. If after the Mayor determines that a tenant support
245 provider has a conflict of interest or has failed to comply with the requirements of this
246 subchapter, the Mayor may limit, suspend, or revoke that qualified purchaser’s certification.”.
247 (f) Section 403 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.03) is amended as follows:
248 (1) The lead-in language is redesignated as subparagraph (a) and amended to read
249 as follows:
250 “(a) An offer of sale shall include, at minimum:”.
251 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
252 “(2) A statement that the tenant has the right to purchase the accommodation
253 under this chapter and a notice that the tenants are entitled to no-cost technical assistance and
254 training on their rights provided by a tenant support provider approved by the Mayor, together
255 with a list of eligible providers and their contact information;”.
11

256 (3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “floor plan.” and inserting the
257 phrase “floor plan;” in its place.
258 (4) New paragraphs (5) and (6) are added to read as follows:
259 “(5) The name and contact information of all tenant support providers certified by
260 the Mayor pursuant to section 402c as of the date of issuance of the offer of sale; provided, that if
261 no such organizations have been certified, the owner will be deemed in compliance with this
262 paragraph; and
263 “(6) Information on the cooling-off period as outlined in section 403c.
264 (5) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
265 “(b)(1) The owner shall provide each tenant with a written copy of the offer of sale by
266 certified mail. Notice to tenants shall be sent to their address at the housing accommodation
267 unless a tenant has supplied in writing to the owner a different address for notice.
268 “(2) On the same date as copies of the offer of sale are postmarked to tenants, the
269 owner shall provide the Mayor with a written copy of the offer of sale and a signed statement
270 confirming that copies of the offer of sale were provided to each tenant. The offer of sale shall be
271 sent to the mayor by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, by commercial
272 overnight delivery service that maintains proof of delivery, by hand delivery, or by any other
273 method designated by the Department. If the owner delivers the notification to the Mayor by
274 hand delivery, the Owner shall obtain a date stamped copy demonstrating the Mayor's receipt.”.
275 (f) A new section 403a is added to read as follows:
276 “Sec. 403a. Notice of transfer.
277 “(a) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), if an opportunity to purchase is not
278 provided under section 402, the owner shall provide the Mayor written notice of a transfer of an
12

279 interest in a housing accommodation or of any ownership interest in a corporation, partnership,
280 limited liability company, association, trust, or other entity which owns a housing
281 accommodation. Such notice shall be provided at least 90 days prior to the proposed date of
282 transfer.
283 “(b) An owner shall not be required to file a notice of transfer with the Mayor for a
284 transfer exempt under section 402b(b), paragraphs (3) and (4).
285 “(c) For a transfer exempt under section 402b(b), paragraphs (2), (8), and (9), in addition
286 to the requirement of subsection (a), an owner shall provide copies of the notice of transfer to
287 each tenant by certified mail. Notice to tenants shall be sent to their address at the housing
288 accommodation unless a tenant has supplied in writing to the owner a different address for
289 notice.
290 “(d) The Notice of Transfer shall be substantially in the form prescribed by the Mayor
291 and shall provide at a minimum:
292 “(1) A statement of the rights of the tenant or the tenant organization under this
293 chapter;
294 “(2) An accurate description of the transfer, including whether the transfer will
295 result in any changes in management, current rents, or any applicable affordability requirements
296 for the housing accommodation;
297 “(3) The date of the proposed transfer; and
298 “(4) The reason, if any, why the owner asserts the transfer may not constitute a
299 sale as defined in section 402b.
300 “(e) In addition to any other requirements for the form of the Notice of Transfer
301 prescribed by this section, a Notice of Transfer for a housing accommodation to be transferred
13

302 for the purposes of receiving tax benefits pursuant to section 42 of the United States Internal
303 Revenue Code of 1986, approved October 22, 1986 (100 Stat. 2189; 26 U.S.C. § 42), or a
304 comparable District program, shall include a description of the applicable federal or District
305 subsidy, and a description of the steps in the transaction employed by the developer to avail itself
306 of the subsidy.
307 “(f) The owner’s failure to provide the Notice of Transfer, or the provision of a notice
308 that is fraudulent or contains material misrepresentations, shall create a rebuttable presumption
309 that the transfer constitutes a sale for purposes of subchapters IV and V of this chapter.
310 “(g) Within 30 days of the receipt by the Mayor of the Notice of Intent to File, a tenant or
311 tenant organization shall have 30 days to file a petition for relief under § 42-3405.03 or § 42-
312 3405.03a. A copy of the petition shall be delivered to the owner by registered or certified mail,
313 return receipt requested, or by personal service. Failure of a tenant or tenant organization to file
314 timely the petition for relief shall preclude the tenant or tenant organization from asserting any
315 rights under subchapters IV and V of this chapter relating to the transfer identified in the Notice
316 of Transfer.
317 “(h) A tenant or tenant organization shall be precluded from asserting any rights under
318 subchapters IV and V of this chapter for a transfer exempt under subsection 402b(b)(3) of this
319 section.
320 “(i) Any change in the transfer agreement that would invalidate a claim of exemption
321 shall be reported in writing to the Mayor, substantially in a form prescribed by the Mayor, and
322 proper notice shall be provided to the tenant or tenant organization.
323 (g) A new section 403b is added to read as follows:
324 “Sec. 403b. Compliance review of offer of sale and notice of transfer.
14

325 “(a) Within 7 days of receipt, the Department shall review each offer of sale received
326 pursuant to section 403 and each notice of transfer received pursuant to section 403a, for the
327 purpose of ensuring compliance with all statutory and regulatory requirements.
328 “(b) The Office shall have the authority to request additional information by written or
329 verbal inquiry, conference, or any other method or combination of methods suitable.
330 “(c) The Department shall establish a process for receiving reports of suspected violations
331 or deficiencies in the issuance of an offer of sale or notice of transfer and shall use such reports
332 to inform the initiation of inquiries pursuant to sections 505 through 510.
333 “(h) A new section 403c is added to read as follows:
334 “Sec. 403c. Cooling-off period; interference prohibited.
335 “(a) Within the first 15 days following receipt of the offer of sale by the Mayor pursuant
336 to section 403, the Mayor shall provide all tenant support providers and qualified purchasers with
337 a copy of the offer of sale, and shall not share information related to the offer of sale with any
338 other individual.
339 “(b) Neither a tenant nor tenant organization may assign purchase rights pursuant to
340 section 406 within the first 45 days after an offer of sale unless having first met with an approved
341 tenant support provider.
342 “(c) Any person that contacts a tenant organization or individual tenant related to an offer
343 or negotiation subject to this subchapter shall disclose:
344 “(1) The names, residence and business addresses of each person with direct,
345 indirect, legal, or beneficial ownership of a governance or total distributional interest of the
346 entity as provided for in § 29-102.01(a)(6) and § 29-102.01(a)(7); and
347 “(2) Any financial connection to the property.
15

348 “(d) Neither the owner nor the third party purchaser or any other agent or party with a
349 financial or other interest in the accommodation shall interfere with the tenants’ exercise of their
350 rights under this subchapter. Interference includes, but is not limited to:
351 “(1) Negotiating with the tenants before approved technical assistance providers
352 have received notice of the offer of sale, presumed to be 15 days after service of the offer of sale
353 upon the District through the Division by the owner;
354 “(2) Attempting to organize the tenants in an effort to persuade the tenants to
355 waive or exercise rights in any particular manner without fully disclosing the interested party’s
356 financial or other interest in the outcome;
357 “(3) Failing to disclose that tenants have a right to no-cost training on their rights
358 under this subchapter, as well as the right to a consultation with a tenant support provider.”.
359 (i) Section 404 is amended to read as follows:
360 “Sec. 404. Third party rights.
361 “(a) The right of a third party to purchase an accommodation is conditional upon exercise
362 of tenant rights under this subchapter. The time periods for negotiation of a contract of sale and
363 for settlement under this subchapter are minimum periods, and the owner may afford the tenants
364 a reasonable extension of such period, without liability under a third party contract.
365 “(b) Third parties and their agents shall not interfere with the tenants’ right to organize or
366 otherwise exercise their rights under this subchapter. Third parties may negotiate with tenants for
367 the assignment or waiver of rights pursuant to section 406, provided that they first disclose:
368 “(1) Their identity and that they are interested in purchasing the accommodation;
369 “(2) That they are not tenant organizers as defined in section 506(a)(2), and do not
370 represent the interests of the tenants; and
16

371 “(3) That the tenants have the right to have a training with certified tenant support
372 provider before engaging in negotiations.
373 “(c) Third party purchasers are presumed to act with full knowledge of tenant rights and
374 public policy under this subchapter.”.
375 (j) A new section 405a is added to read as follows:
376 “Sec. 405a. Template agreements and contracts; filing with department.
377 “(a) No agreement or contract entered into under this subchapter, including buyouts and
378 development agreements, shall be deemed valid or enforceable unless the information specified
379 in this section is filed with the Department within 30 days of signature by all parties.
380 “(1) Information submitted to the Department shall include:
381 “(A) Address and ward;
382 “(B) Unit count;
383 “(C) Sales price;
384 “(D) The number of households that received a buyout, as applicable;
385 “(E) Information related to rent-stabilization;
386 “(F) Information related to income-restricted units and subsidies; and
387 “(G) Other information as determined by the Department.
388 “(b) No later than 180 days after the applicability date of this section and pursuant to
389 Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82
390 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), the Department shall establish:
391 “(1) A standard template for buyout agreements;
392 “(2) A standard template for purchase contracts;
17

393 “(3) Rules governing the minimum information required to be included in a
394 buyout agreement or purchase contract.
395 “(c) The use of templates established pursuant to subsection (b) shall not be mandatory
396 for execution of an agreement governed by this act.”.
397 (k) Section 406 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.06) is amended by striking the phrase
398 “Such an exercise, assignment, or sale may occur at any time in the process provided in this
399 subchapter” and inserting the phrase “Such an exercise, assignment, or sale may occur at any
400 time in the process provided in this subchapter, provided that the requirements of section 403c(b)
401 have been fulfilled.”.
402 (l) A new section 415 is added to read as follows:
403 “Sec. 415. TOPA transparency portal.
404 “(a)(1) Within one year of the applicability date of this subsection, the Mayor shall
405 establish and maintain a publicly accessible and searchable database of information pertinent to
406 this subchapter, which shall include the following information:
407 “(A) Offers of sale received by the Department for which the cooling-off
408 period as prescribed in section 403c(a) has elapsed, including the following information, as
409 applicable:
410 “(i) Address and ward;
411 “(ii) Unit count;
412 “(iii) Reason for notice;
413 “(iv) Asking price and material terms of the sale;
414 “(v) Information related to rent-stabilization; and
415 “(vi) Information related to income-restricted units and subsidies;
18

416 “(B) Whether a tenant organization has been registered pursuant to section
417 402a;
418 “(C) Buyouts, final sales, and development agreements submitted to the
419 Department pursuant to section 405a; and
420 “(D) Notices of transfer received pursuant to section 403b.
421 “(2) To the maximum extent practicable, the database established pursuant to this
422 section shall be integrated with the Public Accessible Rent Control Housing Database as
423 established in Section 203a of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C.
424 Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.03c).
425 “(b) The database established pursuant to subsection (a) shall publish information
426 received by the Department on or after the date of its establishment. The publishing of historical
427 information and data shall be subject to additional funding.
428 “(c) The publishing of any information pursuant to this section does not guarantee the
429 completeness or accuracy of such information, and shall not create liability on the part of the
430 District or by any officer or employee thereof for any damages that result from reliance on the
431 published information.
432 “(d)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of District law, unless otherwise prescribed
433 by this section, information submitted to the Department pursuant to this subchapter shall be
434 deemed confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to section 202 of the District
435 of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, effective March 25, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C.
436 Official Code § 2-532).
437 “(2) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
438 Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
19

439 may issue rules to govern the sharing or publishing of conclusions and analysis derived from
440 information that is received pursuant to this subchapter.”.
441 (n) A new section 416 is added to read as follows:
442 “Sec. 416. Unlawful acts.
443 “It shall be unlawful for any person to:
444 “(1) Coerce a tenant or tenant organization to waive their rights under this
445 subchapter;
446 “(2) Retaliate against or harass a tenant seeking to exercise their rights under this
447 subchapter; or
448 “(3) Make fraudulent or misleading statements or engage in conduct intended to
449 prevent a tenant from exercising their rights under this subchapter.”.
450 (o) Section 436 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.36) is amended to read as follows:
451 “Sec. 436. Assignment of District Rights.
452 “The Mayor may assign the opportunity to purchase provided under this subchapter to a
453 qualified purchaser certified pursuant to section 402d, that agrees to obligate itself and any
454 successors in interest to maintain the affordability required by section 433.”.
455 (p) Section 503 is amended to read as follows:
456 “(a) An aggrieved owner, tenant, or tenant organization may seek enforcement of any
457 right or provision under this chapter through a civil action in law or equity, and, upon prevailing,
458 may seek an award of costs and reasonable attorney fees. In an equitable action, the public policy
459 of this chapter favors the waiver of bond requirements to the extent permissible under law or
460 court rule.
20

461 “(b) Any person suffering a loss due to violations of section 416 shall be entitled to
462 recover, in addition to the amount of actual damages, double the amount of any interest collected
463 in violation of this chapter, plus any reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in the collection of that
464 amount.
465 Sec. 3. Section 302 of the District of Columbia Deed Recordation Tax Act, approved
466 March 2, 1962 (76 Stat. 11; D.C. Official Code 42-1102), is amended by adding a new paragraph
467 (14A) to read as follows:
468 “(14A) Deeds to property transferred to a qualified purchaser, as that term is
469 defined in section 401a of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980, effective
470 September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86, D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.01a), to whom tenant or
471 District purchase rights have been assigned pursuant to sections 406 and 503 of that act.”.
472 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
473 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
474 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
475 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
476 Sec. 5. Applicability.
477 (a) Section 2(i), amendatory subsections (a) and (b), and section 2(j) of this act shall
478 apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
479 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
480 an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
481 of the certification.
482 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
483 the District of Columbia Register.
21

484 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
485 applicability of this act.
486 Sec. 6. Effective date.
487 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
488 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
489 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
490 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
491 Columbia Register.
22